src/phonology/nish.xfscript
! *converting digraphs*
! ch, sh, zh, aa, ii, oo, (not nh, ny, ns)
! though *sVh != *sh phonologically
! caps define abstract segments that are useful in morphophon
define dedigraph [a a -> ǎ, i i -> ǐ, o o -> ǒ, c h -> č, z h -> ž, s h -> š];
define redigraph [ǎ -> a a, ǐ -> i i, ǒ -> o o, č -> c h, ž -> z h, š -> s h];
define cleanse [ [%>|%^|%<|%&] -> 0 ]; 

define bound [%<|%>|%^];
define sigma [b|d|g|p|t|k|j|č|z|s|ž|š|m|n|w|y|%'|h|a|i|o|ǎ|ǐ|ǒ|e|W|Y|I|O|A|E|N|S]; 
define cseqs [[b|d|g|p|t|k|j|č|ž|š|[[š|s](p|t|k)]|[m (b)]|[n (d|z|j|ž|g|h|s|y)]](w)|h|%'|w|y]; 
define codaseqs [b|d|g|p|t|k|j|č|ž|š|w|y|[[š|s](p|t|k)]|[m (b)]|[n (d|z|j|ž|g)]]; 
define longv [ǎ|e|ǐ|ǒ];
define shortv [a|i|o|E];
define absv [A|I|O|E];
define vowel [a|ǎ|i|ǐ|o|ǒ|e|A|I|O|E];

define Spal [S -> s h || _ i ]; !only lex item with alt has i, never ii
define Salv [S -> s];
define Npal [N -> z h || _ [i|ǐ]]; !long and short i?
define Nalv [N -> n]; 

!handle contemptive/diminutive allomorphy
define Ee [E -> e || _ n [y|h|s]];
define Ei [E -> i];
![E shortv -> e] only needed in Minnesota for preterite /*bane/
define Ecoal [E shortv -> e] ; 

define ny [y -> h || n _ .#.] ;

define Ow [ O -> w || vowel _ vowel ];

define absDel [ [absv|W|Y] -> 0 || _ .#. ];

define vvvDel [ shortv -> 0 || _ longv, longv _ ]; 

!need to save contemptives/diminutives from getting aa:
define bleedvCoal [A E -> e];
define vCoal [[o|O] shortv -> ǒ, [i|I] shortv -> ǐ, [a|A] shortv -> ǎ ];
!need to think about glides coalescing with vowels
define yCoal [Y shortv -> i];
define wCoal [W shortv (->) o]; !optional in pls by dialect
define nyCoal [shortv -> i || n y _ ];


define preEpen [ %< -> d || _ vowel ];
define preLen [ o  -> ǒ || %< _ ];
!for dependent stems
define preGli [ o -> w || _ %^ vowel ];  
define preDel [ shortv -> 0 || _ %^ vowel ];  

!devoicing, final lowering is written by non-Rhodes spelling (i->e not standard)
!I hope this syntax carries over from foma
!define devoice [b -> p, d -> t, g -> k || _ .#.];
!define finlow  [o -> a, i (->) e || _ .#.];

define str1 [[..] -> %& || longv _ ];
define str2 [[..] -> %& || shortv _ (codaseqs) .#.];
define str3 [[..] -> %& // shortv cseqs shortv _ ];
define rsync [vowel -> 0 || _ \%& ]; 

read regex [
    dedigraph   .o.
    Spal        .o.
    Salv        .o.
    Npal        .o.
    Nalv        .o.
    vCoal       .o.
    yCoal       .o.
    wCoal       .o.
    Ee          .o.
    Ei          .o.
    str1        .o.
    str2        .o.
    str3        .o.
    rsync       .o.
    redigraph   .o.
    cleanse     
    ];
